Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2302
Nebraska Wheat
Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board; created; members.

There
is hereby established the Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Board. Members shall
be appointed by the Governor to the board pursuant to section 2-2305.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 2, p. 59;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 21;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 2.